Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2064.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1725.4(b) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1725.4. Fee increases and automation fee.* * *(b) Automation fee for clerk of courts office.--(1) In addition to any other fee authorized by law, an automation fee of not more than [$5] $10 may be charged and collected by the clerk of courts of counties of the second class A and the third through eighth class, including home rule counties of the same class, for the initiation of any action or legal proceeding. The automation fee shall be deposited into a special clerk of courts automation fund established in each county. Moneys in the special fund shall 12345678910111213141516171819 be used solely for the purpose of automation and continued automation update of the office of the clerk of courts.(2) The amount of the automation fee under paragraph (1) may be increased not more than once every three years, provided that the amount of the increase may not be greater than the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: All Items (CPI-U) for the United States City Average as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics for the immediate three years preceding an increase in the fee or charge under this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2064PN2648 - 2 - 123456789101112